Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5390XS (2) 91 mb/jh S.F. 2008 Section 1. Section 257.11B, subsection 1, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) âQualified educational expensesâ includes tuition 3 and fees at a nonpublic school that is in compliance with 4 subsection 12 , textbooks, fees or payments for educational 5 therapies, including tutoring or cognitive skills training, 6 curriculum fees, software, and materials for a course of 7 study for a specific subject matter or grade level, tuition 8 or fees for nonpublic online education programs, tuition for 9 vocational and life skills education approved by the department 10 of education, education materials and services for pupils with 11 disabilities from an accredited provider, including the cost of 12 paraprofessionals and assistants who are trained in accordance 13 with state law, standardized test fees, and advanced placement 14 examinations or examinations related to postsecondary education 15 admission or credentialing. 16 Sec. 2. Section 257.11B, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 17 following new subsection: 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 12. A nonpublic school shall not receive 19 tuition payments from parents or guardians whose students 20 are participating in the education savings account program 21 unless the nonpublic school satisfies all of the following 22 requirements: 23 a. The governing body of the nonpublic school must adhere to 24 the accountability and transparency requirements applicable to 25 the boards of directors of school districts in the same manner 26 as the boards of directors of school districts. 27 b. The nonpublic school must adhere to the data reporting 28 requirements applicable to school districts in the same manner 29 as a school district. 30 c. The nonpublic school must adhere to the auditing 31 requirements applicable to school districts in the same manner 32 as a school district. 33